Washington statutes.
RCW 18.19.090

Application for credentials—Contents—Form—Requirements—Exemptions.

(1) Application for agency affiliated counselor, certified counselor, certified adviser, or hypnotherapist must be made on forms approved by the secretary. The secretary may require information necessary to determine whether applicants meet the qualifications for the credential and whether there are any grounds for denial of the credential, or for issuance of a conditional credential, under this chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW. The application for agency affiliated counselor, certified counselor, or certified adviser must include a description of the applicant's orientation, discipline, theory, or technique. Each applicant shall pay a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250, which shall accompany the application.

(2) Applicants for agency affiliated counselor must provide satisfactory documentation that they are employed by an agency, have an offer of employment from an agency, or are a student intern as defined by the department.

(3) Applicants for certified agency affiliated counselor must complete the following:

(a) A bachelor's degree in counseling or one of the social sciences from an accredited college or university which includes coursework specified in subsection (5) of this section; and

(b) At least five years of experience in direct treatment of persons with a mental disorder that was gained under the supervision of a mental health professional who is able to independently provide mental health assessments and diagnoses according to the scope of practice of the mental health professional's credential.

(4) Applicants for licensed agency affiliated counselor must complete the following:

(a) An advanced degree in counseling or one of the social sciences from an accredited college or university which includes coursework specified in subsection (5) of this section; and

(b) At least two years of experience in direct treatment of persons with a mental disorder that was gained under the supervision of a mental health professional who is able to independently provide mental health assessments and diagnoses according to the scope of practice of the mental health professional's credential.

(5) Applicants for a certified or licensed agency affiliated counselor credential must have counseling-specific coursework as determined by the department in rule.

(6)(a) Applicants for licensed agency affiliated counselor are not required to meet the coursework requirements in subsection (5) of this section if, prior to the effective date of the rules adopted under subsection (5) of this section, the applicant held a mental health professional designation based on meeting one of the following criteria:

(i) The applicant held an advanced degree in counseling or one of the social sciences from an accredited college or university and had two years of experience in direct treatment of persons with mental illness or emotional disturbance that was gained under the supervision of a mental health professional recognized by the department or attested to by a licensed behavioral health agency;

(ii) The applicant met the waiver criteria of RCW 71.24.260, and the waiver was granted prior to 1986; or

(iii) The applicant had an approved waiver to perform the duties of a mental health professional, that was requested by the behavioral health organization and granted by the mental health division prior to July 1, 2001.

(b) Applicants for certified agency affiliated counselor are not required to meet the coursework requirements in subsection (5) of this section if, prior to the effective date of the rules adopted under subsection (5) of this section, the applicant met the bachelor's degree and experience requirements in subsection (3) of this section.

(c) Applicants for licensed or certified agency affiliated counselors eligible for the legacy provision under this subsection must apply to the department before July 1, 2027. After that date all new applicants must meet the requirements in subsections (3) and (4) of this section. "New applicants" does not include those reinstating a previously issued agency affiliated counselor certification.

(7) At the time of application for initial certification, applicants for certified counselor prior to July 1, 2010, are required to:

(a) Have been registered for no less than five years at the time of application for an initial certification;

(b) Have held a valid, active registration that is in good standing and be in compliance with any disciplinary process and orders at the time of application for an initial certification;

(c) Show evidence of having completed coursework in risk assessment, ethics, appropriate screening and referral, and Washington state law and other subjects identified by the secretary;

(d) Pass an examination in risk assessment, ethics, appropriate screening and referral, and Washington state law, and other subjects as determined by the secretary; and

(e) Have a written consultation agreement with a credential holder who meets the qualifications established by the secretary.

(8) Unless eligible for certification under subsection (7) of this section, applicants for certified counselor or certified adviser are required to:

(a)(i) Have a bachelor's degree in a counseling-related field, if applying for certified counselor; or

(ii) Have an associate degree in a counseling-related field and a supervised internship, if applying for certified adviser;

(b) Pass an examination in risk assessment, ethics, appropriate screening and referral, and Washington state law, and other subjects as determined by the secretary; and

(c) Have a written supervisory agreement with a supervisor who meets the qualifications established by the secretary.

(9) Each applicant shall include payment of the fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250.

[ 2023 c 425 s 15; 2008 c 135 s 8; 1991 c 3 s 24; 1987 c 512 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 425 ss 1-7, 13-20, and 22-26: See note following RCW 18.83.170.

Effective date—2008 c 135 ss 1, 2, 7-9, and 11-19: See note following RCW 18.19.020.